Missouri, session 2026, HB2191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 302.440, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 302.440, to read as follows:
302.440. In addition to any other provisions of law, a court [may] shall require that
any person who is found guilty of [a first] anintoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in
section 577.001, [and a court shall require that any person who is found guilty of a second or
subsequent intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section 577.001,] shall not
operate any motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped with a functioning, certified ignition
interlock device for a period of not less than six months from the date of reinstatement of the
person's driver's license. In addition, any court authorized to grant a limited driving privilege
under section 302.309 to any person who is found guilty of [a second or subsequent] an
intoxication-related traffic offense, as defined in section 577.001, shall require the use of an
ignition interlock device on all vehicles operated by the person as a required condition of the
limited driving privilege, except as provided in section 302.441. These requirements shall be
in addition to any other provisions of this chapter or chapter 577 requiring installation and
maintenance of an ignition interlock device. Any person required to use an ignition interlock
device shall comply with such requirement subject to the penalties provided by section
577.599.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.